test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TR-PFV-yi_a-istsah_see_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - ìstsáh[see] :
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjSg2:                    niyisʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjSg3:                    yisʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjSg3+DObjGiven:          yisʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjSg3+DObjEmphatic:       miyisʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjSg4:                    guyisʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjSg4+Distr:              dàguyisʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjPl2:                    [nihiyisʔí, nahiyisʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjPl2+Distr:              [dànihiyisʔí, dànahiyisʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjPl3:                    gimiyisʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjPl3+Distr:              dàgimiyisʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjPl3+DObjGiven:          yisʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjPl3+DObjGiven+Distr:    dàyisʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjRefl:                   idiyisʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjAreal:                  guyisʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg1+DObjAreal+Distr:            dàguyisʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjSg1:                    siyíʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjSg3:                    yíʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjSg3+DObjGiven:          yíʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjSg3+DObjEmphatic:       miyíʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjSg4:                    guyíʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjSg4+Distr:              dàguyíʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjPl1:                    [nihiyíʔí, nahiyíʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjPl1+Distr:              [dànihiyíʔí, dànahiyíʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjPl3:                    gimiyíʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjPl3+Distr:              dàgimiyíʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjPl3+DObjGiven:          yíʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjPl3+DObjGiven+Distr:    dàyíʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjRefl:                   idiyíʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjAreal:                  guyíʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg2+DObjAreal+Distr:            dàguyíʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjSg1:                    sáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjSg2:                    náʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjSg3:                    yáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjSg3+DObjGiven:          yiʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjSg4:                    gwáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjSg4+Distr:              dàgwáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjPl1:                    [niháʔí, naháʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjPl1+Distr:              [dàniháʔí, dànaháʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjPl2:                    [niháʔí, naháʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjPl2+Distr:              [dàniháʔí, dànaháʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjPl3:                    gwáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjPl3+Distr:              dàgwáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjPl3+DObjGiven:          yiʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjPl3+DObjGiven+Distr:    dàyiʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjRefl:                   idáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjAreal:                  gwáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg3+DObjAreal+Distr:            dàgwáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg1:                    sits'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg1+Distr:              dàsits'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg2:                    nits'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg2+Distr:              dànits'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg3:                    ts'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg3+Distr:              dàts'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg3+DObjGiven:          ts'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg3+DObjGiven+Distr:    dàts'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg3+DObjEmphatic:       mits'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg3+DObjEmphatic+Distr: dàmits'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg4:                    guts'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjSg4+Distr:              dàguts'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjPl1:                    [nihits'áʔí, nahits'áʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjPl1+Distr:              [dànihits'áʔí, dànahits'áʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjPl2:                    [nihits'áʔí, nahits'áʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjPl2+Distr:              [dànihits'áʔí, dànahits'áʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjPl3:                    gimits'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjPl3+Distr:              dàgimits'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjPl3+DObjGiven:          ts'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjPl3+DObjGiven+Distr:    dàts'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjRecip:                  [ástłits'áʔí, átłits'áʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjRecip+Distr:            [dàástłits'áʔí, dàátłits'áʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjRefl:                   idits'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjRefl+Distr:             dààdits'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjAreal:                  guts'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjSg4+DObjAreal+Distr:            dàguts'áʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg2:                    [niyiìʔí, niyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg2+Distr:              [dàniyiìʔí, dàniyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg3:                    [yiìʔí, yaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg3+Distr:              [dàyiìʔí, dàyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg3+DObjGiven:          [yiìʔí, yaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg3+DObjGiven+Distr:    [dàyiìʔí, dàyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg3+DObjEmphatic:       [miyiìʔí, miyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg3+DObjEmphatic+Distr: [dàmiyiìʔí, dàmiyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg4:                    [guyiìʔí, guyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjSg4+Distr:              [dàguyiìʔí, dàguyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjPl2:                    [nihiyiìʔí, nihiyaàʔí, nahiyiìʔí, nahiyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjPl2+Distr:              [dànihiyiìʔí, dànihiyaàʔí, dànahiyiìʔí, dànahiyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjPl3:                    [gimiyiìʔí, gimiyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjPl3+Distr:              [dàgimiyiìʔí, dàgimiyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjPl3+DObjGiven:          [yiìʔí, yaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjPl3+DObjGiven+Distr:    [dàyiìʔí, dàyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjRecip:                  [ástłiyiìʔí, ástłiyaàʔí, átłiyiìʔí, átłiyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjRecip+Distr:            [dàástłiyiìʔí, dàástłiyaàʔí, dàátłiyiìʔí, dàátłiyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjRefl:                   [idiyiìʔí, idiyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjRefl+Distr:             [dààdiyiìʔí, dààdiyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjAreal:                  [guyiìʔí, guyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl1+DObjAreal+Distr:            [dàguyiìʔí, dàguyaàʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg1:                    siyasʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg1+Distr:              dàsiyasʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg3:                    yasʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg3+Distr:              dàyasʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg3+DObjGiven:          yasʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg3+DObjGiven+Distr:    dàyasʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg3+DObjEmphatic:       miyasʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg3+DObjEmphatic+Distr: dàmiyasʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg4:                    guyasʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjSg4+Distr:              dàguyasʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjPl1:                    [nihiyasʔí, nahiyasʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjPl1+Distr:              [dànihiyasʔí, dànahiyasʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjPl3:                    gimiyasʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjPl3+Distr:              dàgimiyasʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjPl3+DObjGiven:          yasʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjPl3+DObjGiven+Distr:    dàyasʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjRecip:                  [ástłiyasʔí, átłiyasʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjRecip+Distr:            [dàástłiyasʔí, dàátłiyasʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjRefl:                   idiyasʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjRefl+Distr:             dààdiyasʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjAreal:                  guyasʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl2+DObjAreal+Distr:            dàguyasʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg1:                    sigáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg1+Distr:              dàsigáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg2:                    nigáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg2+Distr:              dànigáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg3:                    giyáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg3+Distr:              dàgiyáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg3+DObjGiven:          gáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg3+DObjGiven+Distr:    dàgáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg4:                    gugáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjSg4+Distr:              dàgugáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjPl1:                    [nihigáʔí, nahigáʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjPl1+Distr:              [dànihigáʔí, dànahigáʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjPl2:                    [nihigáʔí, nahigáʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjPl2+Distr:              [dànihigáʔí, dànahigáʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjPl3:                    gugáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjPl3+Distr:              dàgugáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjPl3+DObjGiven:          gáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjPl3+DObjGiven+Distr:    dàgáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjRecip:                  [ástłigáʔí, átłigáʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjRecip+Distr:            [dàástłigáʔí, dàátłigáʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjRefl:                   [igidáʔí, idigáʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjRefl+Distr:             [dààgidáʔí, dààdigáʔí]
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjAreal:                  gugáʔí
    ìstsáh[see]+V+T+Pfv+SbjPl3+DObjAreal+Distr:            dàgugáʔí
